fst/morphology/affixes/verb_suffixes.lexc
LEXICON VTI-m_ImperativeSuffixes
! Immediate
@D.number.PL@+Imm+2Sg:@D.number.PL@%>a VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+21Pl:%>êtân VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Pl:%>amok VERBS_Endlex ;
! Delayed
@D.number.PL@+Del+2Sg:@D.number.PL@%>amôhkan VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+21Pl:%>amôhkahk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Pl:%>amôhkêk VERBS_Endlex ;

!! VTA inflection

LEXICON VTA_Inflection
@R.order.Ind@+Ind:@R.order.Ind@ VTA_IndependentSuffixes ;
@R.order.Cnj@+Cnj:@R.order.Cnj@ VTA_ConjunctSuffixes ;
@R.order.Cond@@D.conjunct.CC@+Cond:@R.order.Cond@@D.conjunct.CC@ VTA_ConditionalSuffixes ;
@R.order.Cond@@R.conjunct.CC@+Cond+Inf:@R.order.Cond@@R.conjunct.CC@ VTA_ConditionalSuffixes ;
@R.order.Imp@+Imp:@R.order.Imp@ VTA_ImperativeSuffixes ;

LEXICON VTA_IndependentSuffixes
@R.person.NI@ VTA_IND_1 ;
@R.person.KI@ VTA_IND_2 ;
@R.person.NULL@ VTA_IND_3 ;

LEXICON VTA_IND_1
@D.diminutive.DIM@@D.number.SG@ VTA_IND_1_PL ;
@D.diminutive.DIM@@D.number.PL@ VTA_IND_1_SG ;
@R.diminutive.DIM@@D.number.SG@ VTA_IND_1_PL_DIM ;
@R.diminutive.DIM@@D.number.PL@ VTA_IND_1_SG_DIM ;

LEXICON VTA_IND_2
@D.diminutive.DIM@@D.number.SG@ VTA_IND_2_PL ;
@D.diminutive.DIM@@D.number.PL@ VTA_IND_2_SG ;
@R.diminutive.DIM@@D.number.SG@ VTA_IND_2_PL_DIM ;
@R.diminutive.DIM@@D.number.PL@ VTA_IND_2_SG_DIM ;

LEXICON VTA_IND_3
@D.diminutive.DIM@@D.number.SG@ VTA_IND_3_PL ;
@D.diminutive.DIM@@D.number.PL@ VTA_IND_3_SG ;
@R.diminutive.DIM@@D.number.SG@ VTA_IND_3_PL_DIM ;
@R.diminutive.DIM@@D.number.PL@ VTA_IND_3_SG_DIM ;

LEXICON VTA_IND_1_SG
+1Sg+3SgO:%>â%>w VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Sg+3PlO:%>â%>wak VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Sg+4Sg/PlO:%>i2%>mâwa VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+1SgO:%>i2k VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+1PlO:%>i2ko%>nân VERBS_Endlex ;
! Unspecified actor
+X+1SgO:%>i2kawi%>n VERBS_Endlex ;
! Inanimate actor
+%0Sg/Pl+1SgO:%>i2ko%>n VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTA_IND_1_SG_DIM
+1Sg+3SgO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>w VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Sg+3PlO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>wak VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Sg+4Sg/PlO:%>i2%>s%^DIMi%>mâwa VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+1SgO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+1PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>nân VERBS_Endlex ;
! Unspecified actor
+X+1SgO:%>i2kawi%>s%^DIMi%>n VERBS_Endlex ;
! Inanimate actor
+%0Sg/Pl+1SgO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>n VERBS_Endlex ;

!! Alternative implementation
! LEXICON VTA_IND_1_DIR
! @D.diminutive.DIM@:@D.diminutive.DIM@%>â VTA_IND_1_SG ;
! @R.diminutive.DIM@:@D.diminutive.DIM@%>â%>s%^DIMi VTA_IND_1_SG ;

! LEXICON VTA_IND_1_SG
! +1Sg+3SgO:%>w VERBS_Endlex ;
! +1Sg+3PlO:%>wak VERBS_Endlex ;
! +1Sg+4Sg/PlO:%>mâwa VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTA_IND_1_PL
+1Pl+3SgO:%>â%>nân VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl+3PlO:%>â%>nânak VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2%>mânâna VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+1SgO:%>i2kw%>ak VERBS_Endlex ; !
+3Pl+1SgO:%>i2ko%>wak VERBS_Endlex ; !
+3Pl+1SgO+Dial:%>i2ko%>wak VERBS_Endlex ; !
+3Pl+1PlO:%>i2ko%>nânak VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+1PlO:%>i2ko%>nâna VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+1SgO:%>i2ko%>ýiwa VERBS_Endlex ;
! Unspecified actor
+X+1PlO:%>i2kawi%>nân VERBS_Endlex ;
! Inanimate actor
+%0Sg/Pl+1PlO:%>i2ko%>nân VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTA_IND_1_PL_DIM
+1Pl+3SgO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>nân VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl+3PlO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>nânak VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2%>s%^DIMi%>mânâna VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+1SgO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>wak VERBS_Endlex ; !
+3Pl+1PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>nânak VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+1PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>nâna VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+1SgO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>ýiwa VERBS_Endlex ;
! Unspecified actor
+X+1PlO:%>i2kawi%>s%^DIMi%>nân VERBS_Endlex ;
! Inanimate actor
+%0Sg/Pl+1PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>nân VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTA_IND_2_SG
+1Sg+2SgO:%>i2ti%>n VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Sg+2PlO:%>i2ti%>nâwâw VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg+1SgO:%>i%>n VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg+1PlO:%>i%>nân VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg+3SgO:%>â%>w VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg+3PlO:%>â%>wak VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg+4Sg/PlO:%>i2%>mâwa VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+2SgO:%>i2k VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+21PlO:%>i2ko%>naw VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+2PlO:%>i2ko%>wâw VERBS_Endlex ;
! Unspecified actor
+X+2SgO:%>i2kawi%>n VERBS_Endlex ;
! Inanimate actor
+%0Sg/Pl+2SgO:%>i2ko%>n VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTA_IND_2_SG_DIM
+1Sg+2SgO:%>i2ti%>s%^DIMi%>n VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Sg+2PlO:%>i2ti%>s%^DIMi%>nâwâw VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg+1SgO:%>i%>s%^DIMi%>n VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg+1PlO:%>i%>s%^DIMi%>nân VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg+3SgO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>w VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg+3PlO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>wak VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg+4Sg/PlO:%>i2%>s%^DIMi%>mâwa VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+2SgO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+21PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>naw VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+2PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>wâw VERBS_Endlex ;
! Unspecified actor
+X+2SgO:%>i2kawi%>s%^DIMi%>n VERBS_Endlex ;
! Inanimate actor
+%0Sg/Pl+2SgO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>n VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTA_IND_2_PL
+1Pl+2SgO:%>i2ti%>nân VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl+2PlO:%>i2ti%>nân VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl+3SgO:%>â%>naw VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl+3PlO:%>â%>nawak VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2%>mânawa VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl+1SgO:%>i%>nâwâw VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl+3SgO:%>â%>wâw VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl+1PlO:%>i%>nân VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl+3PlO:%>â%>wâwak VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2%>mâwâwa VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+2SgO:%>i2k%>wak VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+2SgO:%>i2ko%>wak VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+21PlO:%>i2ko%>nawak VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+2PlO:%>i2ko%>wâwak VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+21PlO:%>i2ko%>nawa VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+2PlO:%>i2ko%>wâwa VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+2SgO:%>i2ko%>ýiwa VERBS_Endlex ;
! Unspecified actor
+X+21PlO:%>i2kawi%>naw VERBS_Endlex ;
+X+21PlO:%>i2kawi%>nânaw VERBS_Endlex ;
+X+2PlO:%>i2kawi%>nâwâw VERBS_Endlex ;
! Inanimate actor
+%0Sg/Pl+21PlO:%>i2ko%>naw VERBS_Endlex ;
+%0Sg/Pl+21PlO:%>i2ko%>nânaw VERBS_Endlex ;
+%0Sg/Pl+2PlO:%>i2ko%>nâwâw VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTA_IND_2_PL_DIM
+1Pl+2SgO:%>i2ti%>s%^DIMi%>nân VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl+2PlO:%>i2ti%>s%^DIMi%>nân VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl+3SgO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>naw VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl+3PlO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>nawak VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2%>s%^DIMi%>mânawa VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl+1SgO:%>i%>s%^DIMi%>nâwâw VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl+3SgO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>wâw VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl+1PlO:%>i%>s%^DIMi%>nân VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl+3PlO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>wâwak VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2%>s%^DIMi%>mâwâwa VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+2SgO:%>i2k%>s%^DIMi%>wak VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+2SgO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>wak VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+21PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>nawak VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+2PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>wâwak VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+21PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>nawa VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+2PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>wâwa VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+2SgO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>ýiwa VERBS_Endlex ;
! Unspecified actor
+X+21PlO:%>i2kawi%>s%^DIMi%>naw VERBS_Endlex ;
+X+21PlO:%>i2kawi%>s%^DIMi%>nânaw VERBS_Endlex ;
+X+2PlO:%>i2kawi%>s%^DIMi%>nâwâw VERBS_Endlex ;
! Inanimate actor
+%0Sg/Pl+21PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>naw VERBS_Endlex ;
+%0Sg/Pl+21PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>nânaw VERBS_Endlex ;
+%0Sg/Pl+2PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>nâwâw VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTA_IND_3_SG
+3Sg+4Sg/PlO:%>ê%>w VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+5Sg/PlO:%>i2%>mêw VERBS_Endlex ;
! Unspecified actor
+X+3SgO:%>â%>w VERBS_Endlex ;
! Inanimate actor
+%0Sg/Pl+3SgO:%>i2ko%>w VERBS_Endlex ;
+%0Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2ko%>ýiwa VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTA_IND_3_SG_DIM
+3Sg+4Sg/PlO:%>ê%>s%^DIMi%>w VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+5Sg/PlO:%>i2%>s%^DIMi%>mêw VERBS_Endlex ;
! Unspecified actor
+X+3SgO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>w VERBS_Endlex ;
! Inanimate actor
+%0Sg/Pl+3SgO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>w VERBS_Endlex ;
+%0Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>ýiwa VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTA_IND_3_PL
+3Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>ê%>wak VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+5Sg/PlO:%>i2%>mêwak VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+3PlO:%>i2ko%>wak VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+3PlO:%>i2k%>wak VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+3PlO+Dial:%>i2ko%>wak VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+3SgO:%>i2%>k VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+3SgO+Dial:%>i2ko%>w VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO:%>ê%>ýiwa VERBS_Endlex ;
+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2ko%>ýiwa VERBS_Endlex ;
! Unspecified actor
+X+3PlO:%>â%>wak VERBS_Endlex ;
+X+4Sg/PlO:%>â%>ýiwa VERBS_Endlex ;
! Inanimate actor
+%0Sg/Pl+3PlO:%>i2ko%>wak VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTA_IND_3_PL_DIM
+3Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>ê%>s%^DIMi%>wak VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+5Sg/PlO:%>i2%>s%^DIMi%>mêwak VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+3PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>wak VERBS_Endlex ;
! +4Sg/Pl+3PlO:%>i2k%>wak VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+3PlO+Dial:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>wak VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+3SgO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+3SgO+Dial:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>w VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO:%>ê%>s%^DIMi%>ýiwa VERBS_Endlex ;
+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>ýiwa VERBS_Endlex ;
! Unspecified actor
+X+3PlO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>wak VERBS_Endlex ;
+X+4Sg/PlO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>ýiwa VERBS_Endlex ;
! Inanimate actor
+%0Sg/Pl+3PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>wak VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTA_ConjunctSuffixes
@D.diminutive.DIM@@D.number.SG@ VTA_CNJ_PL ;
@D.diminutive.DIM@@D.number.PL@ VTA_CNJ_SG ;
@R.diminutive.DIM@@D.number.SG@ VTA_CNJ_PL_DIM ;
@R.diminutive.DIM@@D.number.PL@ VTA_CNJ_SG_DIM ;

LEXICON VTA_CNJ_SG
! 1Sg ->
+1Sg+2SgO:%>i2t%>ân VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Sg+2PlO:%>i2t%>akok VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Sg+3SgO:%>a%>k VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Sg+3PlO:%>a%>kik VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Sg+4Sg/PlO:%>i2%>mak VERBS_Endlex ;
! 2Sg ->
+2Sg+1SgO:%>i%>yan VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg+3SgO:%>a%>t VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg+1PlO:%>i%>yâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg+3PlO:%>a%>cik VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg+4Sg/PlO:%>i2%>mat VERBS_Endlex ;
! 3Sg ->
+3Sg+1SgO:%>it VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+2SgO:%>i2%>sk VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+1PlO:%>i2ko%>yâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+21PlO:%>i2ko%>yahk VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+2PlO:%>i2ko%>yêk VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+4Sg/PlO:%>â%>t VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+5Sg/PlO:%>i2%>mât VERBS_Endlex ;
! Inanimate actor
+%0Sg/Pl+1SgO:%>i2ko%>yân VERBS_Endlex ;
+%0Sg/Pl+2SgO:%>i2ko%>yan VERBS_Endlex ;
+%0Sg/Pl+3SgO:%>i2ko%>t VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTA_CNJ_SG_DIM
! 1Sg ->
+1Sg+2SgO:%>i2t%>i%^DIMs%>ân VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Sg+2PlO:%>i2t%>i%^DIMs%>akok VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Sg+3SgO:%>a%>s%^DIMi%>k VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Sg+3PlO:%>a%>s%^DIMi%>kik VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Sg+4Sg/PlO:%>i2%>s%^DIMi%>mak VERBS_Endlex ;
! 2Sg ->
+2Sg+1SgO:%>i%>s%^DIMi%>yan VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg+3SgO:%>a%>s%^DIMi%>t VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg+1PlO:%>i%>s%^DIMi%>yâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg+3PlO:%>a%>s%^DIMi%>cik VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg+4Sg/PlO:%>i2%>s%^DIMi%>mat VERBS_Endlex ;
! 3Sg ->
+3Sg+1SgO:%>it%>i%^DIMs VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+2SgO:%>i2%>s%^DIMi%>sk VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+1PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>yâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+21PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>yahk VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+2PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>yêk VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+4Sg/PlO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>t VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+5Sg/PlO:%>i2%>s%^DIMi%>mât VERBS_Endlex ;
! Inanimate actor
+%0Sg/Pl+1SgO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>yân VERBS_Endlex ;
+%0Sg/Pl+2SgO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>yan VERBS_Endlex ;
+%0Sg/Pl+3SgO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>t VERBS_Endlex ;
